Hawaii statutes.
[§436H-12] Grounds for denial
of registration; revocation and suspension of registration. In addition to
any other acts or conditions provided by law, the director may deny or refuse
to renew, revoke, suspend, restrict, fine, reprimand, censure, condition, or
place the registration of any athletic trainer on probation when the athletic
trainer:

(1) Fails to meet the requirements for registration
as provided in this chapter;

(2) Has a registration or license or certification as
an athletic trainer conditioned, suspended, revoked, or denied, or has been
refused renewal of registration or license or certification as an athletic
trainer;

(3) Makes a materially false, misleading, deceptive,
or fraudulent representation or material omission in the application for
registration, including any renewal application;

(4) Fails to satisfy a civil fine or penalty arising
out of any administrative or enforcement action for violation of any state's
athletic trainer laws or rules;

(5) Has a license or registration revoked, suspended
or otherwise disciplined by any state or federal agency for any reason that is
provided by the applicable laws or rules or by this section;

(6) Engages in the practice of athletic training
while impaired by alcohol or drugs;

(7) Engages in professional misconduct, incompetence,
gross negligence, or manifest incapacity in the practice of athletic training;

(8) Engages in conduct or a practice contrary to the
recognized standards of ethics and professional responsibility as adopted by
the National Athletic Trainers Association or the Board of Certification, Inc.;

(9) Has been convicted or pleaded nolo contendere to
a crime directly related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the
practice of athletic training;

(10) Fails to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary action taken against the registrant or applicant in another
jurisdiction, including the Board of Certification, Inc., within thirty days of
the disciplinary action; provided, however, that the registrant actually knows
of the disciplinary action; and

(11) Violates this chapter, chapter 436B, or any rule
or order of the director. [L 2012, c 198, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next